fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON N_CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaana N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaan N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihsoaayi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinnaaniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinoainiki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'ki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaanopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihpoaawopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg:@R.person.IMP@%>t N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl:@R.person.IMP@%>k N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

! BELOW ARE THE VII SUFFIXES

LEXICON N_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ N_INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ N_CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ N_SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ N_UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Inanimate Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waistsaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural UNREAL  
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_ANIM_INTERR !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
0 # ;
+Interr:%>hpa # ;

! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.

LEXICON N_ENCLITICS !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
0 # ;
+PRO+3/%0Pl:%>aawa # ;
+PRO+D3Pl:%>%^PROaiksi # ;
+PRO+D3Sg:%>%^PROáyi # ;
+PRO+D%0Pl:%>%^PROaistsi # ;

!! END OF VERBINESS

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
@R.pos.NOUN@ NA_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@ NI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VAI@ NA_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@ NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON INIT_NA_STEMS
aakiiwa:aakii NA ;
imitaawa:imitaa NA_IM ;
isttoana:isttoan2 NA ;
miistsisa:miistsis2 NA ;
moksisa:moksis2 NA ;
ninaawa:ninaa%^AIM NA ;
poosa:poos NA_IM ;
isska:issk NA ;

LEXICON PERS_NA_STEMS
aakiiwa:aakii NA ;
imitaawa:omitaa NA_IM ;
isttoana:%^SPottoan2 NA ;
miistsisa:i2istsis2 NA ;
moksisa:%^SPoksis2 NA ;
ninaawa:inaa%^AIM NA ;
poosa:ohpoos NA_IM ;
isska:%^SPoohk NA ;

LEXICON NA_STEMS
aakiiwa:aakii NA ;
imitaawa:omitaa NA_IM ;
isttoana:i2sttoan2 NA ;
miistsisa:i2istsis2 NA ;
moksisa:oksis2 NA ;
ninaawa:i2naa%^AIM NA ;
poosa:ohpoos NA_IM ;
isska:ohk NA ;

LEXICON INIT_NI_STEMS
aaapani:aaapan2 NI ;
kinakini:kinakin2 NI ;
mo'tokaani:mo'tokaan NI ;
sinaakia'tsisi:sinaakia'tsis2 NI ;
atsikini:atsikin2 NI ;
aahkioohsa'tsisi:aahkioohsa'tsis2	NI ;
miini:miin	NI ;

LEXICON PERS_NI_STEMS
aaapani:i2aapan2 NI ;
kinakini:%^SPohkinakin2 NI ;
mo'tokaani:%^SPo'tokaan NI ;
sinaakia'tsisi:%^SPisinaakia'tsis2 NI ;
atsikini:%^SPatsikin2 NI ;
aahkioohsa'tsisi:aahkioohsa'tsis2	NI ;
miini:i2in	NI ;

LEXICON NI_STEMS
aaapani:i2aapan2 NI ;
kinakini:ohkinakin2 NI ;
mo'tokaani:o'tokaan NI ;
sinaakia'tsisi:sinaakia'tsis2 NI ;
atsikini:itsikin2 NI ;
aahkioohsa'tsisi:yaahkioohtsa'tsis2	NI ;
miini:i2in	NI ;

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.class.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_NI_STEMS
nookóówayi:%^SPookóówan     NID ;
nookóówayi:%^SPookóówa     NID ;
LEXICON NA
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@+NA:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@0  IM ;
@R.class.VAI@+NA+Der/VAI+VAI:@R.class.VAI@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES  "weight: 10" ; 

LEXICON NA_IM
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.im.IM@@P.class.NA@+NA:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.im.IM@@P.class.NA@  IM ;
@R.class.VAI@+NA+Der/VAI+VAI:@R.class.VAI@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON NI
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@+NI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@0  IM ;
@R.class.VII@+NI+Der/VII+VII:@R.class.VII@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON NI_IM
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.im.IM@@P.class.NI@+NI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.im.IM@@P.class.NI@0  IM ;
@R.class.VII@+NI+Der/VII+VII:@R.class.VII@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON NAD
@P.class.NA@+NAD:@P.class.NA@0 POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NID
@P.class.NI@+NID:@P.class.NI@0 POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NOUN_SUFFIXES
@R.class.NA@+NA:@R.class.NA@0 POSS_NUM ;
@R.class.NI@+NI:@R.class.NI@0 POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON IM
!0 POSS_NUM ;
@D.person.NULL@:@D.person.NULL@%>im POSS_NUM ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@ POSS_NUM ;
@R.person.NULL@ POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON POSS_NUM
! Singular possessors
@R.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@R.person.NI@0   NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@R.person.KI@0   NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@R.person.OT@0   NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.NULL@:@R.person.NULL@0      NOUN_FINALS ;
! Plural possessors
@R.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>%^POSSinnaan  NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@R.person.KI@%>%^POSSinnoon NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>oaawa   NOUN_FINALS ;
@R.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>oaawa   NOUN_FINALS ;


LEXICON NOUN_FINALS
@R.class.NA@ NA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.class.NI@ NI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON DEP_NA_STEMS
naaáhsa:%^SPaaáhs	NAD ;
nitaakiaaahsa:aakiaaahs	NAD ;
nitáákiima:áákiim	NAD ;
nitáwahkahtaana:áwahkahtaan	NAD ;
ni'sa:%^SPi's	NAD ;
nitsi'sohkiimaana:i'sohkiimaan	NAD ;
nitsiihkawawa:iihkawa	NAD ;
niihsissa:%^SPiihsiss	NAD ;
nikííhtsimaana:%^SPikííhtsimaan	NAD ;
niksimmotsiima:%^SPiksimmotsiim	NAD ;
niksíssta:%^SPiksísst	NAD ;
nikso'kowa:%^SPikso'kowa	NAD ;
nimssa:%^SPimss	NAD ;
nitsinaaáhsa:inaaáhs	NAD ;
ninaapiima:%^SPinaapiim	NAD ;
ninaima:%^SPinaim	NAD ;
ninna:%^SPinn	NAD ;
nínssta:%^SPínsst	NAD ;
nippitaama:%^SPippitaam	NAD ;
nisahkínaima:%^SPisahkínaim	NAD ;
nisahkómaapiima:%^SPisahkómaapiim	NAD ;
nissa:%^SPiss	NAD ;
nississa:%^SPississ NAD ;
nisskána:%^SPisskán	NAD ;
nitsissohkiimaana:issohkiimaan	NAD ;
nissohkowa:%^SPissohko	NAD ;
níssoko'sa:%^SPíssoko's	NAD ;
nissotana:%^SPissotan	NAD ;
nisstamowa:%^SPisstamo	NAD ;
nisstamoohkowa:%^SPisstamoohko	NAD ;
nitákkaawa:%^SPitákkaa NAD ;
nitana:%^SPitan	NAD ;
niniitsistowahsina:%^SPiniitsistowahsin	NAD ;
nohkówa:%^SPohkó	NAD ;
nohpapiiyihpa:o%^SPhpapiiyihp	NAD ;
nohpatooma:%^SPohpatoom	NAD ;
noko'sa:%^SPoko's	NAD ;
nokoksissta:%^SPokoksisst	NAD ;
nokonna:%^SPokonn	NAD ;
nomahkinaima:%^SPomahkinaim	NAD ;
nooma:%^SPoom	NAD ;
nootoohkiimaana:ootoohkiimaan	NAD ;
nitohkiimaana:ohkiimaan	NAD ;
nootoyooma:%^SPootoyoom	NAD ;
noppitaama:%^SPoppitaam	NAD ;
nóta'sa:%^SPóta's	NAD ;
noyínnaawa:%^SPoyínnaa	NAD ;
nisskáni'taama:%^SPsskáni'taam	NAD ;
niyiihkowa:%^SPiyiihkowa	NAD ;
niistó:%^SPiistó NAD ;
